Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
PART 11
COLORADO FOOD SYSTEMS
ADVISORY COUNCIL

Editor's note:

This part 11 was added with relocations in 2019. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated.

23-31-1101. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:

In September 2009, the federal centers for disease control and prevention reported that no state in the country was meeting national goals for the amount of fruits and vegetables that Americans should be eating. As a result, the centers for disease control and prevention identified, as a first strategy, the creation of food policy councils to improve the food environment and economies at the local, regional, and state levels.

Food policy councils consist of multistakeholder organizations that employ a food systems approach that facilitates evaluation and program development at every stage of the food process from farm to table. By 2016, there were over two hundred twenty food policy councils throughout the United States addressing issues such as healthy food access, economic development, and food procurement. Colorado's food systems advisory council, which was created in 2010, has focused primarily on strengthening healthy food access for all Coloradans through the growth of Colorado agriculture and local food systems and economies.

In 2017, Colorado state university, in partnership with the council and others, released the Colorado blueprint of food and agriculture that identified key assets, emerging issues, and shared priorities for future investments in food and agriculture throughout Colorado. The blueprint and the existing work of the council demonstrate that building local, regional, and state food economies will create jobs, stimulate statewide economic development, and circulate money from local food sales within local communities.

The continuation and enhancement of the council is necessary to address the recommendations in the blueprint to support food system changes designed to grow local, regional, and statewide food economies within which agricultural producers have access to new markets and Colorado's population has improved access to fresh, affordable, and healthy foods; and

Building robust, resilient, and long-term local and regional food economies in Colorado will preserve and protect the natural environment; increase consumer access to fresh, healthy, and safe foods; and provide greater food security for all Coloradans.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire part added with relocations, (HB 19-1202), ch. 403, p. 3565, § 1, effective May 31.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 24-37.3-101 as it existed prior to 2019.

23-31-1102. Colorado food systems advisory council - created - membership - terms - vacancies.

There is hereby established within Colorado state university the Colorado food systems advisory council, referred to in this part 11 as the "council". The council is created as an advisory committee to provide recommendations regarding increasing healthy food access for all Colorado residents, creating economic opportunities for Colorado agricultural producers and food-related businesses, and strengthening local and regional food systems.

The council consists of:

The following six members appointed as indicated:

One representative of the department of education, appointed by the commissioner of education;

One representative of the department of public health and environment, appointed by the executive director of the department of public health and environment;

One representative of the department of agriculture, appointed by the commissioner of agriculture;

One representative of the department of human services, appointed by the executive director of the department of human services;

One representative of the Colorado state university extension, appointed by the director of the Colorado state university extension; and

One representative of the Colorado office of economic development, created in section 24-48.5-101, appointed by the director of the office of economic development; and

Sixteen members appointed by the governor or the governor's designee as follows:

Two members who are recipients of a federal food assistance program, at least one of whom is a recipient of the supplemental nutrition assistance program;

Two members who represent different sectors of agricultural production, one of whom is a specialty crop producer and at least one of whom sells agricultural products to a public school or school district;

Two members who represent food wholesalers or food retailers, one of whom must be a direct market retailer;

One member who represents a statewide anti-hunger organization;

Two members who are knowledgeable about federal agencies, one of whom has expertise in federal food and nutrition service programs and one of whom has expertise in rural community and regional development programs or community and economic development programs;

One member from an academic institution who specializes in economic systems, agriculture, or health care;

Two members who represent institutional procurement, one of whom is from an educational setting and one of whom is from a health-care setting;

One member who represents a local, nonprofit, community organization engaged in a farm-to-school program or local food systems;

One member who represents a food distributor or a food hub;

One member who is knowledgeable about nutrition, preferably a physician licensed in this state or a registered dietician; and

One member who is a representative of a statewide healthy food systems organization.

In making appointments to the council, the appointing authorities shall ensure, to the extent possible, that the membership of the council includes geographic and social diversity, as well as a balance of expertise, both governmental and nongovernmental, in issues relating to Colorado's food systems.

Each member of the council serves at the pleasure of the appointing authority who appointed the member. Each member of the council serves a three-year term; except that the governor or the governor's designee shall appoint six members to serve two-year terms and four members to serve four-year terms. An appointing authority may reappoint the member for one additional three-year term.

Repealed.

Any vacancy on the council shall be filled in the same manner in which the original appointment was made, and the term is for the balance of the unexpired term of the member whose position on the council is vacant.

A majority of the members of the council shall elect a chair and a vice-chair, who shall serve for two-year terms. A member of the council who is an executive director or commissioner of a state department or the executive director's or commissioner's designee may be elected to be a chair or a vice-chair of the council, but both positions shall not be held at the same time by members who are executive directors or commissioners of state departments or their designees.

Each member of the council serves without compensation but may be reimbursed from the food systems advisory council fund created in section 23-31-1105 for actual and necessary subsistence and travel expenses incurred in the performance of the member's duties as a member of the council.

The chair shall hold meetings as often as the chair deems necessary but not less than four times each calendar year. The council shall adopt policies and procedures necessary to carry out its duties. If needed, and if funding is available, Colorado state university may staff the council.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire part added with relocations, (HB 19-1202), ch. 403, p. 3566, § 1, effective May 31.

23-31-1103. Council - purpose and duties.

The purposes of the council include:

Growing local, regional, and statewide food economies within which producers have access to new markets and low-income populations have access to fresh, affordable, and healthy foods. The council will collaborate and coordinate with agricultural producers, relevant state and federal educational institutions, nongovernmental organizations, and consumers to connect state and federal agencies and to provide Colorado agricultural producers, including fruit and vegetable producers, with viable market opportunities. Areas of focus include:

Connecting Colorado agricultural producers to federal food assistance programs by functioning as an interagency liaison between relevant state and federal agencies;

Leveraging the purchasing power of the state's institutions to create new and reliable markets for Colorado agricultural products and support the growth of robust and resilient food systems while providing fresh, affordable, and healthy foods to vulnerable populations; and

Supporting the implementation of the recommendations in the Colorado blueprint of food and agriculture project, ensuring that the recommendations in the blueprint, or its successor project, are updated as needed, and ensuring alignment with other state or local food plans if relevant.

Conducting research regarding national best practices regarding food and nutrition assistance, direct and intermediated market development, institutional procurement, and farm-to-school programs as well as other priorities determined by the council;

Collaborating with, serving as a resource to, and receiving input from local and regional food policy councils in the state; and

Exploring methods of collecting and assessing statewide data relating to council activities and reporting the relevant information and data regarding council activities as required by section 23-31-1106.

The department of agriculture, department of education, department of human services, and department of public health and environment shall cooperate with the council with respect to the council's duties specified in subsection (1) of this section.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire part added with relocations, (HB 19-1202), ch. 403, p. 3569, § 1, effective May 31.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 24-37.3-103 as it existed prior to 2019.

23-31-1104. Subcommittees of the council.

The council may create subcommittees, as the council deems necessary, to carry out the work of the council.

If created, the subcommittees must include representatives of the council and may include persons appointed by the chair and the vice-chair of the council who are not members of the council.

The council may engage in any other activity the council determines is necessary to accomplish the purposes outlined in this part 11.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire part added with relocations, (HB 19-1202), ch. 403, p. 3571, § 1, effective May 31.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 24-37.3-104 as it existed prior to 2019.

23-31-1105. Fund - acceptance of gifts, grants, or donations.

For the purposes of carrying out the duties of the council, the council is authorized to seek and accept gifts, grants, or donations, including in-kind donations, from private or public sources for the purposes of this part 11; except that the council may not accept a gift, grant, or donation that is subject to conditions that are inconsistent with this part 11 or any other law of the state. The council may accept in-kind donations of staff services from the private sector to staff the council. The council is also authorized to accept and expend federal money available for its activities. All private and public money received through gifts, grants, or donations shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit it to the food systems advisory council fund, which fund is created in the state treasury and referred to in this section as the "fund". The money in the fund is continuously appropriated to Colorado state university for allocation to the council for the direct and indirect costs associated with implementing this part 11. Any money in the fund not expended for the purpose of this part 11 may be invested by the state treasurer as provided by law. The state treasurer shall credit all interest and income derived from the investment and deposit of money in the fund to the fund.

Money in the fund may be used for the following purposes:

The actual and necessary expenses incurred by members of the council for serving on the council;

The costs of staffing the council, if staffed by Colorado state university; and

The costs of funding programs initiated by the council or council staff.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire part added with relocations, (HB 19-1202), ch. 403, p. 3571, § 1, effective May 31.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 24-37.3-105 as it existed prior to 2019.

23-31-1106. Reports - recommendations.

Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), no later than January 31, 2021, and January 31 every other year thereafter, the council shall report the information specified in section 23-31-1103 (1)(d) to the house rural affairs and agriculture committee and the senate agriculture and natural resources committee, or their successor committees.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire part added with relocations, (HB 19-1202), ch. 403, p. 3572, § 1, effective May 31.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 24-37.3-106 as it existed prior to 2019.

23-31-1107. Repeal of part.

This part 11 is repealed, effective September 1, 2023. Before the repeal, this part 11 is scheduled for review in accordance with section 2-3-1203.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire part added with relocations, (HB 19-1202), ch. 403, p. 3573, § 1, effective May 31.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 24-37.3-107 as it existed prior to 2019.